sk_SK-lemma/sk_SK.aff
FLAG num
SFX 748 Y 1
SFX 748 ý šia .
PFX 748 Y 1
PFX 748 0 naj .
SFX 749 Y 1
SFX 749 ý šej .
PFX 749 Y 1
PFX 749 0 naj .
SFX 750 Y 1
SFX 750 ý šiu .
PFX 750 Y 1
PFX 750 0 naj .
SFX 751 Y 1
SFX 751 ý šou .
PFX 751 Y 1
PFX 751 0 naj .
SFX 752 Y 1
SFX 752 a 0 .
PFX 752 Y 1
PFX 752 bl bĺ .
SFX 753 N 1
SFX 753 in ín .
SFX 754 N 1
SFX 754 ňa nence .
SFX 755 N 1
SFX 755 ňa niat .
SFX 756 N 1
SFX 756 ňa neniec .
SFX 757 N 1
SFX 757 ňa nencom .
SFX 758 N 1
SFX 758 ňa nencoch .
SFX 759 N 1
SFX 759 ňa nencami .
SFX 760 N 1
SFX 760 ťať tím .
SFX 761 N 1
SFX 761 ťať tíš .
SFX 762 N 1
SFX 762 ťať tí .
SFX 763 N 1
SFX 763 ťať tíme .
SFX 764 N 1
SFX 764 ťať títe .
SFX 765 N 1
SFX 765 ťať tia .
SFX 766 N 1
SFX 766 ťať ti .
SFX 767 N 1
SFX 767 ťať time .
SFX 768 N 1
SFX 768 ťať tite .
SFX 769 N 1
SFX 769 ťať tiac .
SFX 770 N 1
SFX 770 on na .
SFX 771 N 1
SFX 771 on novi .
SFX 772 N 1
SFX 772 on nom .
SFX 773 N 1
SFX 773 on ni .
SFX 774 N 1
SFX 774 on nov .
SFX 775 N 1
SFX 775 on noch .
SFX 776 N 1
SFX 776 on nami .
SFX 777 N 1
SFX 777 ízko ižšie .
SFX 778 N 1
SFX 778 zko ž .
SFX 779 Y 1
SFX 779 ízko ižšie .
PFX 779 Y 1
PFX 779 0 naj .
SFX 780 Y 1
SFX 780 zko ž .
PFX 780 Y 1
PFX 780 0 naj .
SFX 781 N 1
SFX 781 ízky ižší .
SFX 782 N 1
SFX 782 ízky ižšieho .
SFX 783 N 1
SFX 783 ízky ižšiemu .
SFX 784 N 1
SFX 784 ízky ižšom .
SFX 785 N 1
SFX 785 ízky ižším .
SFX 786 N 1
SFX 786 ízky ižších .
SFX 787 N 1
SFX 787 ízky ižšími .
SFX 788 N 1
SFX 788 ízky ižšie .
SFX 789 N 1
SFX 789 ízky ižšia .
SFX 790 N 1
SFX 790 ízky ižšej .
SFX 791 N 1
SFX 791 ízky ižšiu .
SFX 792 N 1
SFX 792 ízky ižšou .
SFX 793 Y 1
SFX 793 ízky ižší .
PFX 793 Y 1
PFX 793 0 naj .
SFX 794 Y 1
SFX 794 ízky ižšieho .
PFX 794 Y 1
PFX 794 0 naj .
SFX 795 Y 1
SFX 795 ízky ižšiemu .
PFX 795 Y 1
PFX 795 0 naj .
SFX 796 Y 1
SFX 796 ízky ižšom .
PFX 796 Y 1
PFX 796 0 naj .
SFX 797 Y 1
SFX 797 ízky ižším .
PFX 797 Y 1
PFX 797 0 naj .
SFX 798 Y 1
SFX 798 ízky ižších .
PFX 798 Y 1
PFX 798 0 naj .
SFX 799 Y 1
SFX 799 ízky ižšími .
PFX 799 Y 1
PFX 799 0 naj .
SFX 800 Y 1
SFX 800 ízky ižšie .
PFX 800 Y 1
PFX 800 0 naj .
SFX 801 Y 1
SFX 801 ízky ižšia .
PFX 801 Y 1
PFX 801 0 naj .
SFX 802 Y 1
SFX 802 ízky ižšej .
PFX 802 Y 1
PFX 802 0 naj .
SFX 803 Y 1
SFX 803 ízky ižšiu .
PFX 803 Y 1
PFX 803 0 naj .
SFX 804 Y 1
SFX 804 ízky ižšou .
PFX 804 Y 1
PFX 804 0 naj .
SFX 805 N 1
SFX 805 octa ôct .
SFX 806 N 1
SFX 806 to oho .
SFX 807 N 1
SFX 807 to omu .
SFX 808 N 1
SFX 808 to om .
SFX 809 N 1
SFX 809 to ým .
SFX 810 N 1
SFX 810 o ím .
SFX 811 N 1
SFX 811 oka ôk .
SFX 812 N 1
SFX 812 ko iek .
SFX 813 N 1
SFX 813 ero ier .
SFX 814 N 1
SFX 814 ieť ím .
SFX 815 N 1
SFX 815 ieť íš .
SFX 816 N 1
SFX 816 ieť í .
SFX 817 N 1
SFX 817 ieť íme .
SFX 818 N 1
SFX 818 ieť íte .
SFX 819 N 1
SFX 819 eť a .
SFX 820 N 1
SFX 820 lieť ľ .
SFX 821 N 1
SFX 821 lieť ľme .
SFX 822 N 1
SFX 822 lieť ľte .
SFX 823 N 1
SFX 823 eť ac .
SFX 824 Y 1
SFX 824 a 0 .
PFX 824 Y 1
PFX 824 bo bô .
SFX 825 N 1
SFX 825 anza ánz .
SFX 826 N 1
SFX 826 o áe .
SFX 827 N 1
SFX 827 osa ôs .
SFX 828 N 1
SFX 828 ky ok .
SFX 829 N 1
SFX 829 te ťa .
SFX 830 N 1
SFX 830 te ťu .
SFX 831 N 1
SFX 831 te ťom .
SFX 832 N 1
SFX 832 e ia .
SFX 833 N 1
SFX 833 ište íšť .
SFX 834 N 1
SFX 834 te ťami .
SFX 835 N 1
SFX 835 lá iel .
SFX 836 N 1
SFX 836 el och .
SFX 837 N 1
SFX 837 alo ál .
SFX 838 N 1
SFX 838 ažda ážd .
SFX 839 N 1
SFX 839 rať eriem .
SFX 840 N 1
SFX 840 rať erieš .
SFX 841 N 1
SFX 841 rať erie .
SFX 842 N 1
SFX 842 rať erieme .
SFX 843 N 1
SFX 843 rať eriete .
SFX 844 N 1
SFX 844 rať erú .
SFX 845 N 1
SFX 845 rať er .
SFX 846 N 1
SFX 846 rať erme .
SFX 847 N 1
SFX 847 rať erte .
SFX 848 N 1
SFX 848 rať erúc .
SFX 849 N 1
SFX 849 tať ci .
SFX 850 N 1
SFX 850 tať cime .
SFX 851 N 1
SFX 851 tať cite .
SFX 852 Y 1
SFX 852 e 0 .
PFX 852 Y 1
PFX 852 br bŕ .
SFX 853 N 1
SFX 853 rdo ŕd .
SFX 854 N 1
SFX 854 chať šem .
SFX 855 N 1
SFX 855 chať šeš .
SFX 856 N 1
SFX 856 chať še .
SFX 857 N 1
SFX 857 chať šeme .
SFX 858 N 1
SFX 858 chať šete .
SFX 859 N 1
SFX 859 chať šú .
SFX 860 N 1
SFX 860 chať š .
SFX 861 N 1
SFX 861 chať šme .
SFX 862 N 1
SFX 862 chať šte .
SFX 863 N 1
SFX 863 chať šúc .
SFX 864 N 1
SFX 864 eno ien .
SFX 865 N 1
SFX 865 ä ena .
SFX 866 N 1
SFX 866 ä enu .
SFX 867 N 1
SFX 867 ä ene .
SFX 868 N 1
SFX 868 ä enom .
SFX 869 N 1
SFX 869 ä ená .
SFX 870 N 1
SFX 870 ä ien .
SFX 871 N 1
SFX 871 ä enám .
SFX 872 N 1
SFX 872 ä enách .
SFX 873 N 1
SFX 873 ä enami .
SFX 874 N 1
SFX 874 eza iez .
SFX 875 N 1
SFX 875 va iev .
SFX 876 N 1
SFX 876 rko ŕk .
SFX 877 N 1
SFX 877 rna ŕn .
SFX 878 N 1
SFX 878 nieť ň .
SFX 879 N 1
SFX 879 nieť ňme .
SFX 880 N 1
SFX 880 nieť ňte .
SFX 881 N 1
SFX 881 iť a .
SFX 882 N 1
SFX 882 iť ac .
SFX 883 N 1
SFX 883 ucho úch .
SFX 884 N 1
SFX 884 rva ŕv .
SFX 885 N 1
SFX 885 no án .
SFX 886 Y 1
SFX 886 a 0 .
PFX 886 Y 1
PFX 886 br bŕ .
SFX 887 N 1
SFX 887 niť ň .
SFX 888 N 1
SFX 888 niť ňme .
SFX 889 N 1
SFX 889 niť ňte .
SFX 890 N 1
SFX 890 ivo ív .
SFX 891 N 1
SFX 891 on nu .
SFX 892 N 1
SFX 892 on ne .
SFX 893 N 1
SFX 893 on ny .
SFX 894 N 1
SFX 894 ta át .
SFX 895 N 1
SFX 895 ea ou .
SFX 896 Y 1
SFX 896 a 0 .
PFX 896 Y 1
PFX 896 bu bú .
SFX 897 N 1
SFX 897 eľa ieľ .
SFX 898 N 1
SFX 898 ursa ús .
SFX 899 N 1
SFX 899 oa uovi .
SFX 900 N 1
SFX 900 oa uom .
SFX 901 N 1
SFX 901 oa uovia .
SFX 902 N 1
SFX 902 oa uov .
SFX 903 N 1
SFX 903 oa uoch .
SFX 904 N 1
SFX 904 ľva liev .
SFX 905 N 1
SFX 905 yro ýr .
SFX 906 N 1
SFX 906 á ých .
SFX 907 N 1
SFX 907 á ým .
SFX 908 N 1
SFX 908 á ými .
SFX 909 N 1
SFX 909 lí ľom .
SFX 910 N 1
SFX 910 lí ľou .
SFX 911 N 1
SFX 911 yľ ýľ .
SFX 912 N 1
SFX 912 yľa ýľ .
SFX 913 N 1
SFX 913 yť udeme .
SFX 914 N 1
SFX 914 yť udete .
SFX 915 N 1
SFX 915 yť udú .
SFX 916 N 1
SFX 916 yť udem .
SFX 917 N 1
SFX 917 yť udeš .
SFX 918 N 1
SFX 918 yť ude .
SFX 919 N 1
SFX 919 byť som .
SFX 920 N 1
SFX 920 byť si .
SFX 921 N 1
SFX 921 byť je .
SFX 922 N 1
SFX 922 byť jest .
SFX 923 N 1
SFX 923 byť jesto .
SFX 924 N 1
SFX 924 byť sme .
SFX 925 N 1
SFX 925 byť ste .
SFX 926 N 1
SFX 926 byť sú .
SFX 927 N 1
SFX 927 yť uď .
SFX 928 N 1
SFX 928 yť uďme .
SFX 929 N 1
SFX 929 yť uďte .
SFX 930 N 1
SFX 930 byť súc .
SFX 931 N 1
SFX 931 yť ol .
SFX 932 N 1
SFX 932 yť ola .
SFX 933 N 1
SFX 933 yť olo .
SFX 934 N 1
SFX 934 yť oli .
SFX 935 N 1
SFX 935 ocha ôch .
SFX 936 N 1
SFX 936 ä ence .
SFX 937 N 1
SFX 937 ä eniec .
SFX 938 N 1
SFX 938 ä encom .
SFX 939 N 1
SFX 939 ä encoch .
SFX 940 N 1
SFX 940 ä encami .
SFX 941 N 1
SFX 941 áť ojím .
SFX 942 N 1
SFX 942 áť ojíš .
SFX 943 N 1
SFX 943 áť ojí .
SFX 944 N 1
SFX 944 áť ojíme .
SFX 945 N 1
SFX 945 áť ojíte .
SFX 946 N 1
SFX 946 áť oja .
SFX 947 N 1
SFX 947 áť oj .
SFX 948 N 1
SFX 948 áť ojme .
SFX 949 N 1
SFX 949 áť ojte .
SFX 950 N 1
SFX 950 áť ojac .
SFX 951 N 1
SFX 951 uť em .
SFX 952 N 1
SFX 952 uť eš .
SFX 953 N 1
SFX 953 uť e .
SFX 954 N 1
SFX 954 uť eme .
SFX 955 N 1
SFX 955 uť ete .
SFX 956 N 1
SFX 956 uť i .
SFX 957 N 1
SFX 957 uť ime .
SFX 958 N 1
SFX 958 uť ite .
SFX 959 N 1
SFX 959 nuť ol .
SFX 960 N 1
SFX 960 nuť la .
SFX 961 N 1
SFX 961 nuť lo .
SFX 962 N 1
SFX 962 nuť li .
SFX 963 N 1
SFX 963 aza ázam .
SFX 964 N 1
SFX 964 aza ázach .
SFX 965 Y 1
SFX 965 a 0 .
PFX 965 Y 1
PFX 965 ca cá .
SFX 966 N 1
SFX 966 o i .
SFX 967 N 1
SFX 967 io í .
SFX 968 Y 1
SFX 968 a 0 .
PFX 968 Y 1
PFX 968 c ci .
SFX 969 N 1
SFX 969 ev vi .
SFX 970 N 1
SFX 970 ev vou .
SFX 971 N 1
SFX 971 ev ví .
SFX 972 N 1
SFX 972 ev vám .
SFX 973 N 1
SFX 973 ev vách .
SFX 974 N 1
SFX 974 ev vami .
SFX 975 N 1
SFX 975 ov vi .
SFX 976 N 1
SFX 976 ov vou .
SFX 977 N 1
SFX 977 ov ví .
SFX 978 N 1
SFX 978 ov vám .
SFX 979 N 1
SFX 979 ov vách .
SFX 980 N 1
SFX 980 ov vami .
SFX 981 N 1
SFX 981 uza úz .
SFX 982 Y 1
SFX 982 o 0 .
PFX 982 Y 1
PFX 982 c ci .
SFX 983 Y 1
SFX 983 ovať ujeme .
PFX 983 Y 1
PFX 983 0 po .
SFX 984 Y 1
SFX 984 ovať ujete .
PFX 984 Y 1
PFX 984 0 po .
SFX 985 Y 1
SFX 985 ovať ujú .
PFX 985 Y 1
PFX 985 0 po .
SFX 986 Y 1
SFX 986 ovať ujem .
PFX 986 Y 1
PFX 986 0 po .
SFX 987 Y 1
SFX 987 ovať uješ .
PFX 987 Y 1
PFX 987 0 po .
SFX 988 Y 1
SFX 988 ovať uje .
PFX 988 Y 1
PFX 988 0 po .
SFX 989 N 1
SFX 989 _on eň .
SFX 990 N 1
SFX 990 _ono eň .
SFX 991 Y 1
SFX 991 a 0 .
PFX 991 Y 1
PFX 991 cha chá .
SFX 992 N 1
SFX 992 ajda ájd .
SFX 993 N 1
SFX 993 uha úh .
SFX 994 N 1
SFX 994 upa úp .
SFX 995 N 1
SFX 995 arta árt .
SFX 996 N 1
SFX 996 ieť em .
SFX 997 N 1
SFX 997 ieť eš .
SFX 998 N 1
SFX 998 ieť e .
SFX 999 N 1
SFX 999 ieť eme .
SFX 1000 N 1
SFX 1000 ieť ete .
SFX 1001 N 1
SFX 1001 ieť ú .
SFX 1002 N 1
SFX 1002 eť 0 .
SFX 1003 N 1
SFX 1003 eť me .
SFX 1004 N 1
SFX 1004 eť te .
SFX 1005 N 1
SFX 1005 ieť úc .
SFX 1006 N 1
SFX 1006 ito ít .
SFX 1007 N 1
SFX 1007 ieb eba .
SFX 1008 N 1
SFX 1008 ieb ebu .
SFX 1009 N 1
SFX 1009 ieb ebe .
SFX 1010 N 1
SFX 1010 ieb ebom .
SFX 1011 N 1
SFX 1011 ieb eby .
SFX 1012 N 1
SFX 1012 ieb ebov .
SFX 1013 N 1
SFX 1013 ieb eboch .
SFX 1014 N 1
SFX 1014 ieb ebmi .
SFX 1015 N 1
SFX 1015 ať u .
SFX 1016 N 1
SFX 1016 ať uc .
SFX 1017 N 1
SFX 1017 tať cu .
SFX 1018 N 1
SFX 1018 tať cuc .
SFX 1019 N 1
SFX 1019 ol lu .
SFX 1020 N 1
SFX 1020 ol le .
SFX 1021 N 1
SFX 1021 ol ly .
SFX 1022 N 1
SFX 1022 oba ôb .
SFX 1023 N 1
SFX 1023 en na .
SFX 1024 N 1
SFX 1024 en nu .
SFX 1025 N 1
SFX 1025 en ne .
SFX 1026 N 1
SFX 1026 en nom .
SFX 1027 N 1
SFX 1027 en ny .
SFX 1028 N 1
SFX 1028 en nov .
SFX 1029 N 1
SFX 1029 en noch .
SFX 1030 N 1
SFX 1030 en nami .
SFX 1031 N 1
SFX 1031 át ta .
SFX 1032 N 1
SFX 1032 át tu .
SFX 1033 N 1
SFX 1033 át te .
SFX 1034 N 1
SFX 1034 át tom .
SFX 1035 N 1
SFX 1035 át ty .
SFX 1036 N 1
SFX 1036 át tov .
SFX 1037 N 1
SFX 1037 át toch .
SFX 1038 N 1
SFX 1038 át tami .
SFX 1039 N 1
SFX 1039 eľ le .
SFX 1040 N 1
SFX 1040 eľ ľov .
SFX 1041 N 1
SFX 1041 eľ ľoch .
SFX 1042 N 1
SFX 1042 eľ ľami .
SFX 1043 N 1
SFX 1043 ľať lem .
SFX 1044 N 1
SFX 1044 ľať leš .
SFX 1045 N 1
SFX 1045 ľať le .
SFX 1046 N 1
SFX 1046 ľať leme .
SFX 1047 N 1
SFX 1047 ľať lete .
SFX 1048 N 1
SFX 1048 ľať li .
SFX 1049 N 1
SFX 1049 ľať lime .
SFX 1050 N 1
SFX 1050 ľať lite .
SFX 1051 N 1
SFX 1051 ieť 0 .
SFX 1052 N 1
SFX 1052 ieť me .
SFX 1053 N 1
SFX 1053 ieť te .
SFX 1054 N 1
SFX 1054 unta únt .
SFX 1055 N 1
SFX 1055 ieť ejem .
SFX 1056 N 1
SFX 1056 ieť eješ .
SFX 1057 N 1
SFX 1057 ieť eje .
SFX 1058 N 1
SFX 1058 ieť ejeme .
SFX 1059 N 1
SFX 1059 ieť ejete .
SFX 1060 N 1
SFX 1060 yba ýb .
SFX 1061 N 1
SFX 1061 ďa dence .
SFX 1062 N 1
SFX 1062 ďa deniec .
SFX 1063 N 1
SFX 1063 ďa dencom .
SFX 1064 N 1
SFX 1064 ďa dencoch .
SFX 1065 N 1
SFX 1065 ďa dencami .
SFX 1066 N 1
SFX 1066 ať iam .
SFX 1067 N 1
SFX 1067 ať iaš .
SFX 1068 N 1
SFX 1068 ať iame .
SFX 1069 N 1
SFX 1069 ať iate .
SFX 1070 N 1
SFX 1070 ľa ieľ .
SFX 1071 N 1
SFX 1071 i mi .
SFX 1072 N 1
SFX 1072 ulum úl .
SFX 1073 N 1
SFX 1073 ano án .
SFX 1074 N 1
SFX 1074 ipa íp .
SFX 1075 N 1
SFX 1075 unt a .
SFX 1076 N 1
SFX 1076 nt 0 .
SFX 1077 N 1
SFX 1077 unt om .
SFX 1078 N 1
SFX 1078 unt 0 .
SFX 1079 N 1
SFX 1079 unt ach .
SFX 1080 N 1
SFX 1080 unt ami .
SFX 1081 Y 1
SFX 1081 a 0 .
PFX 1081 Y 1
PFX 1081 ci cí .
SFX 1082 N 1
SFX 1082 ino ín .
SFX 1083 N 1
SFX 1083 ino ína .
SFX 1084 N 1
SFX 1084 ino ínam .
SFX 1085 N 1
SFX 1085 ino ínach .
SFX 1086 N 1
SFX 1086 ino ínami .
SFX 1087 N 1
SFX 1087 í ejší .
SFX 1088 N 1
SFX 1088 í ejšieho .
SFX 1089 N 1
SFX 1089 í ejšiemu .
SFX 1090 N 1
SFX 1090 í ejšom .
SFX 1091 N 1
SFX 1091 í ejším .
SFX 1092 N 1
SFX 1092 í ejších .
SFX 1093 N 1
SFX 1093 í ejšími .
SFX 1094 N 1
SFX 1094 í ejšie .
SFX 1095 N 1
SFX 1095 í ejšia .
SFX 1096 N 1
SFX 1096 í ejšej .
SFX 1097 N 1
SFX 1097 í ejšiu .
SFX 1098 N 1
SFX 1098 í ejšou .
SFX 1099 Y 1
SFX 1099 í ejší .
PFX 1099 Y 1
PFX 1099 0 naj .
SFX 1100 Y 1
SFX 1100 í ejšieho .
PFX 1100 Y 1
PFX 1100 0 naj .
SFX 1101 Y 1
SFX 1101 í ejšiemu .
PFX 1101 Y 1
PFX 1101 0 naj .
SFX 1102 Y 1
SFX 1102 í ejšom .
PFX 1102 Y 1
PFX 1102 0 naj .
SFX 1103 Y 1
SFX 1103 í ejším .
PFX 1103 Y 1
PFX 1103 0 naj .
SFX 1104 Y 1
SFX 1104 í ejších .
PFX 1104 Y 1
PFX 1104 0 naj .
SFX 1105 Y 1
SFX 1105 í ejšími .
